Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.250.060

Availability of state funding for students enrolled in online courses or programs.

(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, school districts may claim state funding under RCW 28A.232.020, to the extent otherwise allowed by state law, for students enrolled in online courses or programs only if the online courses or programs are:

(a) Offered by a multidistrict online provider approved under RCW 28A.250.020 by the superintendent of public instruction;

(b) Offered by a school district online learning program if the program serves students who reside within the geographic boundaries of the school district, including school district programs in which fewer than ten percent of the program's students reside outside the school district's geographic boundaries; or

(c) Offered by a regional online learning program where courses are jointly developed and offered by two or more school districts or an educational service district through an interdistrict cooperative program agreement.

(2) Beginning with the 2013-14 school year, school districts may claim state funding under RCW 28A.232.020, to the extent otherwise allowed by state law, for students enrolled in online courses or programs only if the online courses or programs are offered by an online provider approved under RCW 28A.250.020 by the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) Criteria shall be established by the superintendent of public instruction to allow online courses that have not been approved by the superintendent of public instruction to be eligible for state funding if the course is in a subject matter in which no courses have been approved and, if it is a high school course, the course meets Washington high school graduation requirements.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 507; 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 8; 2009 c 542 s 7.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Finding—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 34: See RCW 28A.232.005.